Washington statutes.
RCW 16.36.023

Fees—Rules.

(1) The director may adopt rules establishing fees for:

(a) The establishment and inspection of animal holding facilities authorized under this chapter;

(b) The inspection and monitoring of animals in authorized animal holding facilities; and

(c) Special inspections of animals or animal facilities that the director may provide at the request of the animal owner or interested persons.

(2) The fees shall, as closely as practicable, cover the cost of the service provided.

(3) All fees collected under this section shall be deposited in an account in the agricultural local fund and used to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

[ 2008 c 285 s 28.]

NOTES:

Intent—Captions not law—Effective date—2008 c 285: See notes following RCW 43.22.434.